en: plazma biscuit
hr: plazma keks, plazma keksi
it: biscotto al plasma

en: vanilla flavored pudding powder
hr: prašak za puding s okusom vanilije
it: polvere di budino al gusto di vaniglia

en: powdered preparation
hr: praškasta mješavina, praškasto punjenje
it: preparato in polvere

en: powdered preparation with palm fat
hr: praškasti pripravak s palminom masti, praškasti pripravak s palminim uljem
it: preparato in polvere con grasso di palma

en: coating, seasoning
bg: Покритие
bs: smjesa za paniranje
cs: ochucující
de: Beschichtung, Überzug
es: envolviendo, sobrimiento, sazonador
et: kate
fi: päällyste
fr: enrobage, enrobant, décor, decor, chemisage, nappage, nappage blond
hr: preljev
hu: bevonat, fűszerezés
it: rivestimento
ja: シーズニング
lt: apvalkalas
lv: pārklājums
nb: belegg
nl: coating
pl: panierka
ro: inveliş
sl: skorjica
sv: överdrag
tr: kaplama

en: cocoa coating
hr: kakao preljev, kakaov preljev, kakaovog preljeva
it: rivestimento al cacao
lt: kakavos glaistas

en: chocolate coating
ca: cobertura de xocolata, cobertura de cacau
es: cobertura de chocolate
fr: chocolat de couverture
hr: čokoladna kuvertura, čokoladni preljev, preljev od čokolade, preljev s čokoladom, preljev okusa čokolade
it: rivestimento di cioccolato
lt: šokoladinis glaistas
pl: czekolada couverture
pt: chocolate de cobertura

en: milk chocolate coating, couverture milk chocolate
de: Milchschokoladenkuvertüre, Milchschokoladenüberzug
fr: chocolat au lait de couverture, enrobage chocolat au lait
hr: miliječno čokoladni preljev, preljev okusa mliječne čokolade, preljev od mliječne čokalade, preljev mliječne čokolade
it: rivestimento di cioccolato al latte
lt: pieniško šokolado glaistas
sv: mjölkchokladsöverdrag

fr: chocolat noir de couverture
ca: cobertura de xocolata negra, cobertura de xocolata negre, cobertura de cacau pur
es: cobertura de chocolate puro, cobertura de chocolate negro
hr: preljev okusa tamne čokolade
pt: chocolate de cobertura negro, chocolate negro de cobertura

en: white chocolate coating
fr: chocolat blanc de couverture, enrobage au chocolat blanc
hr: bijeli čokoladni preljev, preljev s bijelom čokoladom
it: rivestimento di cioccolato bianco

en: hazelnut coating
hr: preljev s lješnjacíma
it: copertura di nocciole

en: chocolate and hazelnut coating
hr: preljev s čokoladom i lješnjacima
it: copertura al cioccolato e nocciole

en: milk and hazelnut coating
hr: preljev s mlijekom i lješnjacima
it: copertura al latte e nocciole

en: nougat coating
hr: nougat preljev
it: rivestimento al torrone

en: berry coating
hr: preljev od bobičastog voća
it: rivestimento di bacche

en: blueberry coating
hr: preljev od borovnica
it: rivestimento di mirtilli

en: strawberry coating
fr: nappage à la fraise
hr: preljev od jagode
it: rivestimento di fragole

en: cherry coating
hr: preljev od višnje, preljev od soka višnje
it: rivestimento di ciliegia

en: amarena cherry coating
hr: preljev s okusom višnje amarena
it: copertura di amarene

en: forest berry coating
hr: preljev od šumskog voća
it: rivestimento ai frutti di bosco